Utah statutes.
4-24-7.   Recordation of brand or mark.

(1) Application for a recorded brand or mark shall be made to the department upon forms prescribed and furnished by it. The application shall contain such information as the commissioner prescribes. No application shall be approved without payment of the appropriate recording fee. Upon receipt of a proper application, payment of the recording fee, and recordation of the brand or mark in the central Brand or Mark Registry of the department, the commissioner shall issue the applicant a certified copy of recording which entitles the applicant to the exclusive use of the brand or mark recorded.

(2)  Each recorded brand or mark filed with the central Brand and Mark Registry shall expire during the calendar year 1980, and during each fifth year thereafter. The department shall give notice in writing to all persons who are owners of recorded brands and marks within a reasonable time prior to the date of expiration of recordation. Brand or mark renewal is effected by filing an appropriate application with the department together with payment of the renewal fee. A recorded brand or mark, not timely renewed, shall lapse and be removed from the central Brand and Mark Registry.



Enacted by Chapter 2, 1979 General Session

